Hawaii, session 2026, SB797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State does not automatically enroll federal supplemental security income (SSI) program participants into the State's medicaid program.  The federal SSI program is an important program that provides monthly payments to people who have little or no income or resources and who have a disability or are an older adult, and financial eligibility is based on national criteria. However, the medicaid program, which provides health insurance to low-income individuals, is administered at the state level, resulting in varying medicaid eligibility policies across different states. The legislature further finds that thirty-three states and Washington, D.C. automatically enroll federal SSI recipients into medicaid based on notification from the Social Security Administration.  In fact, section 1634 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1383(c)) authorizes states to enter into automatic enrollment agreements with the Social Security Administration.  However, Hawaiʻi residents who participate in the federal SSI program must complete a separate application for medicaid and wait for the application to be processed. According to research reported in the Social Security Bulletin, requiring a separate application for medicaid may limit enrollment due to the additional burden of completing the application.  Medicaid participation in states without automatic enrollment is significantly lower than in states that automatically enroll federal SSI program participants into their state medicaid programs. The purpose of this Act is to require the State to automatically enroll federal supplemental security income program participants in the State's medicaid program. SECTION 2. Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-    Enrollment of federal supplemental security income program participants in medicaid.  The department shall automatically enroll, or authorize the Social Security Administration to automatically enroll, in the State's medicaid program any individual in the State who receives federal supplemental security income benefits.  The enrollment shall be within thirty days of receipt of notification of the individual's eligibility for federal supplemental security income benefits from the Social Security Administration.  The department shall not require federal supplemental security income program participants to submit an additional application or fulfill additional criteria in order to enroll in medicaid." SECTION 3. The department of human services shall submit a report on its progress made to implement this Act to the legislature no later than forty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________